Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 7. General Provisions.

Sec. 29.45.800.
Applicability of AS 29.45.010 — 29.45.560.

AS

29.45.010

—

29.45.560

apply to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

29.45.570

. Renumbered in 1992, at which time the internal reference was changed from “AS

29.45.010

—

29.45.570

” to “AS

29.45.010

—

29.45.560

” to reflect the renumbering.

Sec. 29.45.810.
Exemption from municipal taxation.

A party to a contract approved by the legislature as a result of submission of a proposed contract developed under AS 43.82 or as a result of acts by the legislature in implementing the purposes of AS 43.82, and the property, gas, products, and activities associated with the approved qualified project that is subject to the contract, are exempt, as specified in the contract, from all taxes identified in the contract that would be levied and collected by a municipality under state law as a consequence of the participation by the party in the approved qualified project.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 5 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 29.45.820.
Taxes or fees on transportation by certain air carriers prohibited.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, a municipality may not levy or collect a tax or fee on the air transportation of individuals or goods by a federally certificated air carrier other than a tax or fee authorized under 49 U.S.C. 40116(e) or 40117. This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 29 SLA 1994; am § 82 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

29.47.470

.
Renumbered in 2008.